Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 51 GROUND WATER MANAGEMENT DISTRICTS
§ 42-5129. Effect of exclusion on liability for assessments.

Any water user excluded from the district on the grounds specified in subsection (1) of section 42-5126, Idaho Code, shall not be subject to assessment by the district for any purpose. Any water user excluded from the district on the grounds specified in subsection (2) of section 42-5126, Idaho Code, shall not be subject to assessment for operation of the district or for assessment expenses after the entry of the order of exclusion, or in case of appeal, the effective date of exclusion, but shall remain subject to the following liabilities until discharged:

Such excluded water user shall remain liable for payment of assessments previously levied and unpaid at the time of the entry of the order of exclusion, or in case of appeal, the effective date of exclusion.

Such excluded water user, notwithstanding his exclusion, shall remain liable to pay his proportionate share, such share to be computed as specified in section 42-5113, Idaho Code, of any indebtedness of the district already incurred and outstanding at the time of the entry of the order of exclusion, or in case of appeal, the effective date of exclusion, but such water user shall not be liable upon any indebtedness incurred thereafter.

Any water user, as defined in section 42-5102, Idaho Code, who, after exclusion, remains subject to either or both of the liabilities specified herein shall, in addition, remain subject to the provisions of sections 42-5121, 42-5122, 42-5123 and 42-5124, Idaho Code, until such liabilities have been discharged.

Upon the discharge of any liability, the district shall issue to the water user its certificate of full payment executed by the chairman of the board and the secretary of the district, and acknowledged so that the certificate may be recorded in the records of the county wherein the property of the water user affected by such liability and the discharge thereof is situated.

§ 42-5130. Costs.

On appeal, costs shall be taxed as in other civil cases. Costs of recording the order of exclusion shall be borne by petitioners when the order is entered by the board of directors and by the ground water management district when entered by the district court.

§ 42-5131. Exclusion to be recorded.

The decision and order of the board of directors, or of the district court in case of appeal, excluding the petitioner or petitioners from the district shall be filed for record in the recorder’s office of the counties within which the district is situated.

§ 42-5132. Severability.

The provisions of this act are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of this act.